Tennessee, session 114, SB1701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
68-1-2501. Uterine fibroid database.
(a) Using data currently available to the department of health, no later than
January 1, 2027, the department shall establish and maintain an electronic database of
information related to uterine fibroids to increase awareness about uterine fibroids and
ensure women receive the information and health care necessary to prevent and treat
the condition. The database must include:
(1) Demographic attributes of women diagnosed with uterine fibroids;
and
(2) Treatments for uterine fibroids used by healthcare providers.
(b) Information regarding a woman who is diagnosed with or treated for uterine
fibroids that is maintained in the database under subsection (a) may be used only by the
department for uterine fibroid research.
(c) The department shall ensure that the information in the database is
maintained in accordance with applicable state and federal law to maintain the
confidentiality of individually identifiable health information.
68-1-2502. Uterine fibroid education.
No later than January 1, 2027, the department, in consultation with the
Tennessee Medical Association, shall publish on the department's internet website
SB1701
010649
- 1 -

existing resources and educational materials on uterine fibroids to increase public
awareness of uterine fibroids, including information on and awareness of the:
(1) Women of a race or ethnicity that have a statistically elevated risk of
developing uterine fibroids; and
(2) Range of available treatment options for uterine fibroids that include
non-hysterectomy treatments and procedures.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010649